test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-a_gt-norm.yaml
aavranConfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - spaha:
    spaha+N+Sg+Nom:  spaha
    spaha+N+Sg+Gen:  spava
    spaha+N+Sg+Ill:  spahan
    spaha+N+Sg+Loc:  spavvaast
    spaha+N+Sg+Com:  spavvain
    spaha+N+Sg+Abe:  spavattáá
    spaha+N+Ess:  spahhaan
    spaha+N+Pl+Nom:  spavah
    spaha+N+Pl+Gen:  spavai
    spaha+N+Pl+Acc:  spavaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Ill:  spavvaid
    spaha+N+Pl+Loc:  spavain
    spaha+N+Pl+Com:  spavaiguin
    spaha+N+Pl+Abe:  spavaittáá

  Noun - rahka:
    rahka+N+Sg+Nom:  rahka
    rahka+N+Sg+Gen:  rahka
    rahka+N+Sg+Ill:  raahkan
    rahka+N+Sg+Loc:  rahkaast
    rahka+N+Sg+Com:  rahkain
    rahka+N+Sg+Abe:  rahkattáá
    rahka+N+Ess:  rahkan
    rahka+N+Pl+Nom:  rahkah
    rahka+N+Pl+Gen:  rahkai
    rahka+N+Pl+Acc:  rahkaid
    rahka+N+Pl+Ill:  rahkaid
    rahka+N+Pl+Loc:  rahkain
    rahka+N+Pl+Com:  rahkaiguin
    rahka+N+Pl+Abe:  rahkaittáá

  Noun - njamma:
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom:  njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen:  njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill:  njaaman
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc:  njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com:  njammain
    njamma+N+Sg+Abe:  njamattáá
    njamma+N+Ess:  njamman
    njamma+N+Pl+Nom:  njamah
    njamma+N+Pl+Gen:  njamai
    njamma+N+Pl+Acc:  njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Ill:  njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Loc:  [njammain, njamain]
    njamma+N+Pl+Com:  njamaiguin
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe:  njamaittáá

  Noun - plasma:
    plasma+N+Sg+Nom:  plasma
    plasma+N+Sg+Gen:  plasma
    plasma+N+Sg+Ill:  plaasman
    plasma+N+Sg+Loc:  plasmaast
    plasma+N+Sg+Com:  plasmain
    plasma+N+Sg+Abe:  plasmattáá
    plasma+N+Ess:  plasman
    plasma+N+Pl+Nom:  plasmah
    plasma+N+Pl+Gen:  plasmai
    plasma+N+Pl+Acc:  plasmaid
    plasma+N+Pl+Ill:  plasmaid
    plasma+N+Pl+Loc:  plasmain
    plasma+N+Pl+Com:  plasmaiguin
    plasma+N+Pl+Abe:  plasmaittáá

  Noun - hana:
    hana+N+Sg+Nom:  hana
    hana+N+Sg+Gen:  hana
    hana+N+Sg+Ill:  hanan
    hana+N+Sg+Loc:  hanast
    hana+N+Sg+Com:  hanain
    hana+N+Sg+Abe:  hanattáá
    hana+N+Ess:  hanan
    hana+N+Pl+Nom:  hanah
    hana+N+Pl+Gen:  hanai
    hana+N+Pl+Acc:  hanaid
    hana+N+Pl+Ill:  hanaid
    hana+N+Pl+Loc:  hanain
    hana+N+Pl+Com:  hanaiguin
    hana+N+Pl+Abe:  hanaittáá

  Noun - lahna:
    lahna+N+Sg+Nom:  lahna
    lahna+N+Sg+Gen:  lahna
    lahna+N+Sg+Ill:  laahnan
    lahna+N+Sg+Loc:  lahnaast
    lahna+N+Sg+Com:  lahnain
    lahna+N+Sg+Abe:  lahnattáá
    lahna+N+Ess:  lahnan
    lahna+N+Pl+Nom:  lahnah
    lahna+N+Pl+Gen:  lahnai
    lahna+N+Pl+Acc:  lahnaid
    lahna+N+Pl+Ill:  lahnaid
    lahna+N+Pl+Loc:  lahnain
    lahna+N+Pl+Com:  lahnaiguin
    lahna+N+Pl+Abe:  lahnaittáá

  Noun - avra:
    avra+N+Sg+Nom:  avra
    avra+N+Sg+Gen:  avra
    avra+N+Sg+Ill:  aavran
    avra+N+Sg+Loc:  avraast
    avra+N+Sg+Com:  avrain
    avra+N+Sg+Abe:  avrattáá
    avra+N+Ess:  avran
    avra+N+Pl+Nom:  avrah
    avra+N+Pl+Gen:  avrai
    avra+N+Pl+Acc:  avraid
    avra+N+Pl+Ill:  avraid
    avra+N+Pl+Loc:  avrain
    avra+N+Pl+Com:  avraiguin
    avra+N+Pl+Abe:  avraittáá

  Noun - kavra:
    kavra+N+Sg+Nom:  kavra
    kavra+N+Sg+Gen:  kavra
    kavra+N+Sg+Ill:  kaavran
    kavra+N+Sg+Loc:  kavraast
    kavra+N+Sg+Com:  kavrain
    kavra+N+Sg+Abe:  kavrattáá
    kavra+N+Ess:  kavran
    kavra+N+Pl+Nom:  kavrah
    kavra+N+Pl+Gen:  kavrai
    kavra+N+Pl+Acc:  kavraid
    kavra+N+Pl+Ill:  kavraid
    kavra+N+Pl+Loc:  kavrain
    kavra+N+Pl+Com:  kavraiguin
    kavra+N+Pl+Abe:  kavraittáá

  Noun - kassa:
    kassa+N+Sg+Nom:  kassa
    kassa+N+Sg+Gen:  kasa
    kassa+N+Sg+Ill:  kaasan
    kassa+N+Sg+Loc:  kassaast
    kassa+N+Sg+Com:  kassain
    kassa+N+Sg+Abe:  kasattáá
    kassa+N+Ess:  kassan
    kassa+N+Pl+Nom:  kasah
    kassa+N+Pl+Gen:  kasai
    kassa+N+Pl+Acc:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Ill:  kassaid
    kassa+N+Pl+Loc:  kassain
    kassa+N+Pl+Com:  kasaiguin
    kassa+N+Pl+Abe:  kasaittáá

  Noun - laava:
    laava+N+Sg+Nom:  laava
    laava+N+Sg+Gen:  laava
    laava+N+Sg+Ill:  laavan
    laava+N+Sg+Loc:  laavast
    laava+N+Sg+Com:  laavain
    laava+N+Sg+Abe:  laavattáá
    laava+N+Ess:  laavan
    laava+N+Pl+Nom:  laavah
    laava+N+Pl+Gen:  laavai
    laava+N+Pl+Acc:  laavaid
    laava+N+Pl+Ill:  laavaid
    laava+N+Pl+Loc:  laavain
    laava+N+Pl+Com:  laavaiguin
    laava+N+Pl+Abe:  laavaittáá

  Noun - seŋkka:
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Nom:  seŋkka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Gen:  seŋka
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Ill:  seeŋkan
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Loc:  seŋkkaast
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Com:  seŋkkain
    seŋkka+N+Sg+Abe:  seŋkattáá
    seŋkka+N+Ess:  seŋkkan
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Nom:  seŋkah
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Gen: [seeŋkai, seŋkai]
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Acc:  seeŋkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Ill:  seŋkkaid
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Loc:  seeŋkain
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Com:  seŋkaiguin
    seŋkka+N+Pl+Abe:  seŋkaittáá

  Noun - teltta:
    teltta+N+Sg+Nom:  teltta
    teltta+N+Sg+Gen:  telta
    teltta+N+Sg+Ill:  teeltan
    teltta+N+Sg+Loc:  telttaast
    teltta+N+Sg+Com:  telttain
    teltta+N+Sg+Abe:  teltattáá
    teltta+N+Ess:  telttan
    teltta+N+Pl+Nom:  teltah
    teltta+N+Pl+Gen:  teltai
    teltta+N+Pl+Acc:  teltaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Ill:  telttaid
    teltta+N+Pl+Loc:  teltain
    teltta+N+Pl+Com:  teltaiguin
    teltta+N+Pl+Abe:  teltaittáá

  Noun - maila:
    maila+N+Sg+Nom:  maila
    maila+N+Sg+Gen:  maila
    maila+N+Sg+Ill:  mailan
    maila+N+Sg+Loc:  mailaast
    maila+N+Sg+Com:  mailain
    maila+N+Sg+Abe:  mailattáá
    maila+N+Ess:  mailan
    maila+N+Pl+Nom:  mailah
    maila+N+Pl+Gen:  mailai
    maila+N+Pl+Acc:  mailaid
    maila+N+Pl+Ill:  mailaid
    maila+N+Pl+Loc:  mailain
    maila+N+Pl+Com:  mailaiguin
    maila+N+Pl+Abe:  mailaittáá

  Noun - ohra:
    ohra+N+Sg+Nom:  ohra
    ohra+N+Sg+Gen:  ohra
    ohra+N+Sg+Ill:  oohran
    ohra+N+Sg+Loc:  ohraast
    ohra+N+Sg+Com:  ohrain
    ohra+N+Sg+Abe:  ohrattáá
    ohra+N+Ess:  ohran
    ohra+N+Pl+Nom:  ohrah
    ohra+N+Pl+Gen:  ohrai
    ohra+N+Pl+Acc:  ohraid
    ohra+N+Pl+Ill:  ohraid
    ohra+N+Pl+Loc:  ohrain
    ohra+N+Pl+Com:  ohraiguin
    ohra+N+Pl+Abe:  ohraittáá

  Noun - sooda:
    sooda+N+Sg+Nom:  sooda
    sooda+N+Sg+Gen:  sooda
    sooda+N+Sg+Ill:  soodan
    sooda+N+Sg+Loc:  soodast
    sooda+N+Sg+Com:  soodain
    sooda+N+Sg+Abe:  soodattáá
    sooda+N+Ess:  soodan
    sooda+N+Pl+Nom:  soodah
    sooda+N+Pl+Gen:  soodai
    sooda+N+Pl+Acc:  soodaid
    sooda+N+Pl+Ill:  soodaid
    sooda+N+Pl+Loc:  soodain
    sooda+N+Pl+Com:  soodaiguin
    sooda+N+Pl+Abe:  soodaittáá

  Noun - luokka:
    luokka+N+Sg+Nom:  luokka
    luokka+N+Sg+Gen:  luoka
    luokka+N+Sg+Ill:  luokan
    luokka+N+Sg+Loc:  luokkaast
    luokka+N+Sg+Com:  luokkain
    luokka+N+Sg+Abe:  luokattáá
    luokka+N+Ess:  luokkan
    luokka+N+Pl+Nom:  luokah
    luokka+N+Pl+Gen:  luokai
    luokka+N+Pl+Acc:  luokaid
    luokka+N+Pl+Ill:  luokkaid
    luokka+N+Pl+Loc:  luokain
    luokka+N+Pl+Com:  luokaiguin
    luokka+N+Pl+Abe:  luokaittáá

  Noun - tutka:
    tutka+N+Sg+Nom:  tutka
    tutka+N+Sg+Gen:  tutka
    tutka+N+Sg+Ill:  tuutkan
    tutka+N+Sg+Loc:  tutkaast
    tutka+N+Sg+Com:  tutkain
    tutka+N+Sg+Abe:  tutkattáá
    tutka+N+Ess:  tutkan
    tutka+N+Pl+Nom:  tutkah
    tutka+N+Pl+Gen:  tutkai
    tutka+N+Pl+Acc:  tutkaid
    tutka+N+Pl+Ill:  tutkaid
    tutka+N+Pl+Loc:  tutkain
    tutka+N+Pl+Com:  tutkaiguin
    tutka+N+Pl+Abe:  tutkaittáá

  Noun - tulppa:
    tulppa+N+Sg+Nom:  tulppa
    tulppa+N+Sg+Gen:  tulpa
    tulppa+N+Sg+Ill:  tuulpan
    tulppa+N+Sg+Loc:  tulppaast
    tulppa+N+Sg+Com:  tulppain
    tulppa+N+Sg+Abe:  tulpattáá
    tulppa+N+Ess:  tulppan
    tulppa+N+Pl+Nom:  tulpah
    tulppa+N+Pl+Gen:  tulpai
    tulppa+N+Pl+Acc: [tulppaid, tuulpaid]
    tulppa+N+Pl+Ill:  tulppaid
    tulppa+N+Pl+Loc:  tulpain
    tulppa+N+Pl+Com:  tulpaiguin
    tulppa+N+Pl+Abe:  tulpaittáá

  Noun - tundra:
    tundra+N+Sg+Nom:  tundra
    tundra+N+Sg+Gen:  tundra
    tundra+N+Sg+Ill:  tuundran
    tundra+N+Sg+Loc:  tundraast
    tundra+N+Sg+Com:  tundrain
    tundra+N+Sg+Abe:  tundrattáá
    tundra+N+Ess:  tundran
    tundra+N+Pl+Nom:  tundrah
    tundra+N+Pl+Gen:  tundrai
    tundra+N+Pl+Acc:  tundraid
    tundra+N+Pl+Ill:  tundraid
    tundra+N+Pl+Loc:  tundrain
    tundra+N+Pl+Com:  tundraiguin
    tundra+N+Pl+Abe:  tundraittáá
